North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-08 Regulations Governing Operators

39-08-01.
Persons under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any other drugs or substances not to operate vehicle — Penalty.

A person may not drive or be in actual physical control of any vehicle upon a highway or upon public or private areas to which the public has a right of access for vehicular use in this state if any of the following apply:

That person has an alcohol concentration of at least eight one-hundredths of one percent by weight at the time of the performance of a chemical test within two hours after the driving or being in actual physical control of a vehicle.

That person is under the influence of intoxicating liquor.

That person is under the influence of any drug or substance or combination of drugs or substances to a degree which renders that person incapable of safely driving.

That person is under the combined influence of alcohol and any other drugs or substances to a degree which renders that person incapable of safely driving.

That individual refuses to submit to any of the following:

A chemical test, or tests, of the individual’s blood, breath, or urine to determine the alcohol concentration or presence of other drugs, or combination thereof, in the individual’s blood, breath, or urine, at the direction of a law enforcement officer under section 39-06.2-10.2 if the individual is driving or is in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle; or

A chemical test, or tests, of the individual’s blood, breath, or urine to determine the alcohol concentration or presence of other drugs, or combination thereof, in the individual’s blood, breath, or urine, at the direction of a law enforcement officer under section 39-20-01.

Subdivision e does not apply to an individual unless the individual has been advised of the consequences of refusing a chemical test consistent with the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of North Dakota.

An individual who operates a motor vehicle on a highway or on public or private areas to which the public has a right of access for vehicular use in this state who refuses to submit to a chemical test, or tests, required under section 39-06.2-10.2 or 39-20-01, is guilty of an offense under this section.

An individual violating this section or equivalent ordinance is guilty of a class B misdemeanor for the first or second offense in a seven-year period, of a class A misdemeanor for a third offense in a seven-year period, and of a class C felony for any fourth or subsequent offense within a fifteen-year period. The minimum penalty for violating this section is as provided in subsection 5. The court shall take judicial notice of the fact that an offense would be a subsequent offense if indicated by the records of the director or may make a subsequent offense finding based on other evidence.

Upon conviction of a second or subsequent offense within seven years under this section or equivalent ordinance, the court may order the motor vehicle number plates of all of the motor vehicles owned and operated by the offender at the time of the offense to be destroyed by the office of the police officer that made the arrest. The offender shall deliver the number plates to the court without delay at a time certain as ordered by the court following the conviction. The court shall deliver the number plates to the office and notify the department of the order. An offender who does not provide the number plates to the court at the appropriate time is subject to revocation of probation. The court may make an exception to this subsection, on an individual basis, to avoid undue hardship to an individual who is completely dependent on the motor vehicle for the necessities of life, including a family member of the convicted individual and a co-owner of the motor vehicle, or if the offender is participating in the twenty-four seven sobriety program.

A person convicted of violating this section, or an equivalent ordinance, must be sentenced in accordance with this subsection.

For a first offense, the sentence must include both a fine of at least five hundred dollars and an order for addiction evaluation by an appropriate licensed addiction treatment program.

In addition, for a first offense when the convicted person has an alcohol concentration of at least sixteen one-hundredths of one percent by weight, the offense is an aggravated first offense and the sentence must include a fine of at least seven hundred fifty dollars and at least two days’ imprisonment.

For a second offense within seven years, the sentence must include at least ten days’ imprisonment, of which forty-eight hours must be served consecutively; a fine of one thousand five hundred dollars; an order for addiction evaluation by an appropriate licensed addiction treatment program; and at least three hundred sixty days’ participation in the twenty-four seven sobriety program under chapter 54-12 as a mandatory condition of probation.

For a third offense within seven years, the sentence must include at least one hundred twenty days’ imprisonment; a fine of at least two thousand dollars; an order for addiction evaluation by an appropriate licensed addiction treatment program; at least three hundred sixty days’ supervised probation; and at least three hundred sixty days’ participation in the twenty-four seven sobriety program under chapter 54-12 as a mandatory condition of probation.

For a fourth or subsequent offense within fifteen years, the sentence must include at least one year and one day’s imprisonment; a fine of at least two thousand dollars; an order for addiction evaluation by an appropriate licensed treatment program; at least two years’ supervised probation; and participation in the twenty-four seven sobriety program under chapter 54-12 as a mandatory condition of probation.

The imposition of sentence under this section may not be deferred under subsection 4 of section 12.1-32-02 for an offense subject to this section.

If the offense is subject to subdivision a or b, a municipal court or district court may not suspend a sentence, but may convert each day of a term of imprisonment to ten hours of community service for an offense subject to paragraph 2 of subdivision a. If the offense is subject to subdivision c, the district court may suspend a sentence, except for sixty days’ imprisonment, under subsection 3 of section 12.1-32-02 on the condition that the defendant first undergo and complete an evaluation for alcohol and substance abuse treatment and rehabilitation. If the offense is subject to subdivision d, the district court may suspend a sentence, except for one year’s imprisonment, under subsection 3 of section 12.1-32-02 on the condition that the defendant first undergo and complete an evaluation for alcohol and substance abuse treatment and rehabilitation. If the defendant is found to be in need of alcohol and substance abuse treatment and rehabilitation, the district court may order the defendant placed under the supervision and management of the department of corrections and rehabilitation and is subject to the conditions of probation under section 12.1-32-07. The district court may require the defendant to complete alcohol and substance abuse treatment and rehabilitation under the direction of the drug court program as a condition of probation in accordance with rules adopted by the supreme court. The district court may terminate probation under this section when the defendant completes the drug treatment program. If the district court finds that a defendant has failed to undergo an evaluation or complete treatment or has violated any condition of probation, the district court shall revoke the defendant’s probation and shall sentence the defendant in accordance with this subsection.

For purposes of this section, conviction of an offense under a law or ordinance of another state which is equivalent to this section must be considered a prior offense if such offense was committed within the time limitations specified in this section.

If the penalty mandated by this section includes imprisonment or placement upon conviction of a violation of this section or equivalent ordinance, and if an addiction evaluation has indicated that the defendant needs treatment, the court may order the defendant to undergo treatment at an appropriate licensed addiction treatment program under subdivision g of subsection 1 of section 12.1-32-02 and the time spent by the defendant in the treatment must be credited as a portion of a sentence of imprisonment or placement under this section. A court may not order the department of corrections and rehabilitation to be responsible for the costs of treatment in a private treatment facility.

If the court sentences an individual to the legal and physical custody of the department of corrections and rehabilitation, the department may place the individual in an alcohol treatment program designated by the department. Upon the individual’s successful completion of the alcohol treatment program, the department shall release the individual from imprisonment to begin the court-ordered period of probation. If there is not any court-ordered period of probation, the court may order the individual to serve the remainder of the sentence of imprisonment on supervised probation and the terms and conditions must include participation in the twenty-four seven sobriety program and any terms and conditions of probation previously imposed by the court. Probation under this subsection may include placement in another facility or treatment program. If an individual is placed in another facility or treatment program after release from imprisonment, the remainder of the individual’s sentence of imprisonment must be considered time spent in custody. Individuals incarcerated under this section subsequent to a second probation revocation are not eligible for release from imprisonment upon the successful completion of treatment.

If the individual has participated in the twenty-four seven sobriety program as a condition of pretrial release or for the purpose of receiving a temporary restricted operator’s license under section 39-06.1-11, the sentencing court may give credit for the time the individual has already served on the twenty-four seven sobriety program when determining the amount of time the individual must serve on the twenty-four seven sobriety program for the purposes of probation, if that individual has not violated the twenty-four seven sobriety program before sentencing.

As used in subdivisions b and c of subsection 5, the term “imprisonment” includes house arrest. As a condition of house arrest, a defendant may not consume alcoholic beverages. The house arrest must include a program of electronic home detention and the defendant shall participate in the twenty-four seven sobriety program. The defendant shall defray all costs associated with the electronic home detention. For an offense under subdivision b or c of subsection 5, no more than ninety percent of the sentence may be house arrest.

As used in this title, participation in the twenty-four seven sobriety program under chapter 54-12 means compliance with sections 54-12-27 through 54-12-31, and requires sobriety breath testing twice per day seven days per week or electronic alcohol monitoring, urine testing, or drug patch testing. The offender is responsible for all twenty-four seven sobriety program fees and the court may not waive the fees. For purposes of this section, the twenty-four seven sobriety program is a condition of probation and a court may not order participation in the program as part of the sentence. If an individual ordered to participate in the twenty-four seven program is not a resident of this state, that individual shall enroll in a twenty-four seven program or an alcohol compliance program if available in that individual’s state of residence and shall file proof of such enrollment.

The fact any person charged with violating this section is or has been legally entitled to use alcohol or other drugs or substances is not a defense against any charge for violating this section. It is an affirmative defense that a drug was used only as directed or cautioned by a practitioner who legally prescribed or dispensed the drug to that person. If the individual violated subdivisions a, b, c, or d of this subsection and subdivision e of this subsection and the violations arose from the same incident, for purposes of suspension or revocation of an operator’s license, the violations are deemed a single violation and the court shall forward to the department of transportation only the conviction for driving under the influence or actual physical control.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1925 Supp., §§ 2976t10, 2976t11; S.L. 1927, ch. 162, §§ 2, 62; R.C. 1943, § 39-0801; S.L. 1949, ch. 250, § 1; 1953, ch. 247, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 39-0801; S.L. 1959, ch. 286, § 13; 1961, ch. 259, § 1; 1969, ch. 342, § 1; 1971, ch. 371, § 1; 1973, ch. 302, § 1; 1975, ch. 106, §§ 434, 673; 1975, ch. 342, § 1; 1975, ch. 343, § 1; 1975, ch. 344, § 2; 1977, ch. 350, § 2; 1977, ch. 356, § 1; 1981, ch. 394, § 1; 1981, ch. 395, § 1; 1981, ch. 486, § 16; 1983, ch. 415, § 21; 1985, ch. 429, § 8; 1987, ch. 460, § 7; 1989, ch. 158, § 14; 1991, ch. 394, § 6; 1993, ch. 382, § 2; 1993, ch. 387, § 1; 1993, ch. 388, § 1; 1997, ch. 323, § 2; 1999, ch. 112, § 3; 1999, ch. 346, § 1; 2001, ch. 346, § 1; 2001, ch. 347, § 1; 2003, ch. 316, § 2; 2003, ch. 323, § 1; 2005, ch. 333, § 1; 2008, ch. 335, § 1; 2009, ch. 335, § 1; 2013, ch. 294, § 2; 2013, ch. 301, § 7; 2015, ch. 267, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 268, § 6, effective April 15, 2015; 2017, ch. 108, § 14, effective April 21, 2017; 2017, ch. 268, §§ 1, 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 186, § 5, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 322, §§ 1, 2, effective April 9, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 267, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 6 of chapter 268, S.L. 2015 became effective April 15, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 15 of chapter 268, S.L. 2015.

Note.

Section 39-08-01 was amended 3 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 2 of Chapter 268, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2176; Section 1 of Chapter 268, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2176; and Section 14 of Chapter 108, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1041.

This section is set out above to reflect a correction since the 2015 cumulative supplement. Additional 2015 amendments were incorporated into this section.

Section 14 of chapter 268, S.L. 2015 provides,

“RETROACTIVE APPLICATION.

Subsection 1 of section 39-08-01, as amended by section 6 of this Act, applies retroactively to violations of subdivision a, b, c, or d of subsection 1 of section 39-08-01 and subdivision e of subsection 1 of section 39-08-01 which arose from the same incident and which occurred on or after June 30, 2013.”

Section 39-08-01 was amended 2 times by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in section 1 of chapter 267, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2154; and section 6 of chapter 268, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2052.

Cross-References.

Applicability of provisions relating to driving under the influence, see § 39-10-01.

Arrest without warrant authorized, see § 29-06-15.

Attempt to contact parents of child taken into custody for violating this section to explain implied consent chemical testing requirements, see § 39-20-01.

City’s power to prohibit driving while intoxicated, see § 40-05-02.

Implied consent law, see ch. 39-20.

Implied consent to determine alcoholic and drug content of blood, see § 39-20-01.

Licensing substance abuse treatment programs, see ch. 50-31.

Notice to enroll in treatment program, enforcement, see § 39-06.1-10.

Open container law, see § 39-08-18.

Procedure for disposition of noncriminal violations unavailable for certain offenses, see § 39-06.1-05.

Temporary restricted license, limitation on issuance to violators, see § 39-06.1-11.

39-08-01.1.
Prior offenses.

For purposes of this chapter, chapter 39-06.1, and chapter 39-20 a previous conviction does not include any prior violation of section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance if the offense occurred prior to July 1, 1981.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 415, § 23.

39-08-01.2.
Special punishment for causing injury or death while operating a vehicle while under the influence of alcohol.

An individual is guilty of criminal vehicular homicide if the individual commits an offense under section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance and as a result the individual causes a death of another individual to occur, including the death of an unborn child, unless the individual who causes the death of the unborn child is the mother. A violation of this subsection is a class A felony. If an individual commits a violation under this subsection, the court shall impose at least three years’ imprisonment. If the individual violates this section after having been previously convicted of a violation of section 39-08-01 or 39-08-03, or equivalent ordinance, the court shall impose at least ten years’ imprisonment. An individual may not be prosecuted and found guilty of this and an offense under chapter 12.1-16 if the conduct arises out of the same incident.

An individual is guilty of criminal vehicular injury if the individual violates section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance and as a result that individual causes substantial bodily or serious bodily injury to another individual. Violation of this subsection is a class C felony. If an individual violates this subsection, the court shall impose at least one year’s imprisonment. If the individual violates this section after having been previously convicted of a violation of section 39-08-01 or 39-08-03 or equivalent ordinance, the court shall impose at least two years’ imprisonment.

The sentence under this section may not be suspended unless the court finds that manifest injustice would result from the imposition of the sentence. Before a sentence under this section applies, a defendant must be notified of the minimum mandatory sentence. The elements of an offense under this section are the elements of an offense for a violation of section 39-08-01 and the additional elements that create an offense in each subsection of this section. Whether an individual caused death or substantial or serious bodily injury must be determined in accordance with section 12.1-02-05.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 415, § 22; 1987, ch. 460, § 8; 2009, ch. 335, § 2; 2013, ch. 301, § 8; 2017, ch. 268, § 3, effective August 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Mandatory revocation of license, see § 39-06-31.

39-08-01.3.
Alcohol-related traffic offenses — Seizure, forfeiture, and sale of motor vehicles.

A motor vehicle owned and operated by an individual upon a highway or upon public or private areas to which the public has a right of access for vehicular use may be seized, forfeited, and sold or otherwise disposed of pursuant to an order of the court at the time of sentencing if the individual is in violation of section 39-08-01, 39-08-01.2, or 39-08-01.4, or an equivalent ordinance and has been convicted of violating section 39-08-01 or an equivalent ordinance at least one other time within the seven years preceding the violation.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 466, § 1; 1999, ch. 346, § 2; 2013, ch. 301, § 9.

Collateral References.

Validity, construction, and application of ignition interlock laws, 15 A.L.R.6th 375.

Law Reviews.

“A Comparison of Drinking and Driving Law in Norway and North Dakota: More Than a Difference in Penalties,” 76 N.D. L. Rev. 33 (2000).

39-08-01.4.
Driving while under the influence of alcohol while being accompanied by a minor — Penalty.

It is a class A misdemeanor for an individual who is at least twenty-one years of age to violate section 39-08-01 if the violation occurred while a minor was accompanying the individual in a motor vehicle. If an individual has a previous conviction for a violation of section 39-08-01.4, a violation of this section is a class C felony. An individual convicted under this section must be sentenced in accordance with subsection 5 of section 39-08-01.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 378, § 1; 2013, ch. 301, § 10; 2015, ch. 267, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 267, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

39-08-01.5.
Partial suspension of sentence for drug court program or veterans treatment docket completion.

Notwithstanding section 39-08-01, all but ten days of the minimum mandatory sentence required for a defendant charged with a third or subsequent violation of section 39-08-01 may be suspended on the condition the defendant successfully completes a drug court program or veterans treatment docket approved by the supreme court.

Upon successful completion of a drug court program or veterans treatment docket, a defendant convicted of a felony under section 39-08-01 and sentenced to drug court or veterans treatment docket is deemed to have been convicted of a misdemeanor.

If a defendant convicted of a misdemeanor under section 39-08-01 is sentenced to drug court or veterans treatment docket and successfully completes a drug court program or veterans treatment docket, the court shall dismiss the case and seal the file in accordance with section 12.1-32-07.2.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 268, § 7, effective April 15, 2015; 2019, ch. 188, § 3, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 110, § 3, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

This section became effective April 15, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 15 of chapter 268, S.L. 2015.

39-08-01.6.
Criminal record — Seal — Exception.

The court shall seal an individual’s criminal record in accordance with sections 12.1-32-07.1 and 12.1-32-07.2 which relates to a conviction under section 39-08-01, if the individual:

Has pled guilty or nolo contendere to, or has been found guilty of a violation under section 39-08-01; or an equivalent ordinance; and

Has not pled guilty or nolo contendere to, or has not been found guilty of a subsequent violation of section 39-08-01, or any other criminal offense, within seven years of the first violation under section 39-08-01 or an equivalent ordinance, or.

This section does not apply to an individual licensed as a commercial driver under section 39-06.2-10 or to a prosecutor’s access to a prior offense for purposes of enhancement under subsection 3 of section 39-08-01 or an equivalent ordinance.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 323, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 293, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 39-08-01.6 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 293, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1336; and Section 1 of Chapter 294, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1355.

39-08-02.
Person conveying passengers not to engage drivers addicted to intoxicants — Penalty.

No person owning or having the direction or control of any vehicle for the conveyance of passengers in this state may employ or continue in the person’s employment as a driver of such vehicle any person who is known to the actor to be addicted to a controlled substance or given to the excessive use of controlled substances or intoxicating liquors. Any person violating the provisions of this section is guilty of an infraction and is liable for all damages sustained by reason of such violation.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 29, § 51; R.C. 1895, § 1157; R.C. 1899, § 1157; R.C. 1905, § 1461; C.L. 1913, § 2053; R.C. 1943, § 39-0802; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 435.

Collateral References.

Vehicular accident, passengers’ liability to vehicular victim for harm caused by intoxicated motor vehicle driver, 64 A.L.R.4th 272.

Sufficiency of showing of physical inability to take tests for driving while intoxicated to justify refusal, 68 A.L.R.4th 776.

Law Reviews.

The Drunken Driver and Punitive Damages: A Survey of the Case Law and the Feasibility of a Punitive Damage Award in North Dakota, 59 N.D. L. Rev. 391 (1983).

39-08-03.
Reckless driving — Aggravated reckless driving — Penalty.

Any person is guilty of reckless driving if the person drives a vehicle:

Recklessly in disregard of the rights or safety of others; or

Without due caution and circumspection and at a speed or in a manner so as to endanger or be likely to endanger any person or the property of another.

Except as otherwise herein provided, any person violating the provisions of this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor. Any person who, by reason of reckless driving as herein defined, causes and inflicts injury upon the person of another, is guilty of aggravated reckless driving, and is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 162, §§ 3, 63; R.C. 1943, § 39-0803; S.L. 1949, ch. 251, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 39-0803; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 10; 1975, ch. 349, § 5.

Cross-References.

Applicability on highways and elsewhere, see §§ 39-10-01, 39-09-01.1.

Care required in operation of vehicle, see § 39-09-01, 39-09-01.1.

39-08-03.1.
Exhibition driving and drag racing — Definitions — Penalty.

No person may engage in exhibition driving of any vehicle on a highway, street, alley, sidewalk, or any public or private parking lot or area, nor may any person engage in a race, a speed competition, drag race or acceleration contest, test of physical endurance, or exhibition of speed or acceleration. Any person who violates this section by engaging in an act defined by subdivision b of subsection 2 must be assessed a fee of fifty dollars. Any person who violates this section by engaging in an act defined by subdivision a or c of subsection 2 must be assessed a fee of one hundred dollars.

As used in this section:

“Drag race” means the operation of two or more vehicles from a point side by side by accelerating rapidly in a competitive attempt to cause one vehicle to outdistance the other; or the operation of one or more vehicles over a common selected course from the same point to the same point for the purpose of comparing the relative speed or powers of acceleration of such vehicle or vehicles within a certain distance or time limit.

“Exhibition driving” means driving a vehicle in a manner which disturbs the peace by creating or causing unnecessary engine noise, tire squeal, skid, or slide upon acceleration or braking; or driving and executing or attempting one or a series of unnecessarily abrupt turns.

“Race” means the use of one or more vehicles in an attempt to outgain, outdistance, or to arrive at a given distance ahead of another vehicle or vehicles; or the use of one or more vehicles to willfully prevent another vehicle from passing the racing vehicle or vehicles, or to test the physical stamina or endurance of the persons driving the vehicles over a long-distance driving route.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting drag racing, exhibition driving, or similar events when carried out in an organized manner on a track or other privately owned area specifically set aside and used solely for such purposes by drivers of motor vehicles, including snowmobiles.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 339, § 18; 1981, ch. 392, § 3; 1987, ch. 471, § 1.

39-08-04.
Accidents involving death or personal injuries — Penalty.

The driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury to or death of any person shall immediately stop or return with the vehicle as close as possible to the scene of the accident and in every event shall remain at the scene of the accident until that driver has fulfilled the requirements of section 39-08-06. Every stop required by this section must be made without obstructing traffic more than is necessary.

Any person failing to comply with the requirements of this section under circumstances involving personal injury is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. Any person negligently failing to comply with the requirements of this section under circumstances involving serious personal injury is guilty of a class C felony. Any person negligently failing to comply with the requirements of this section under circumstances involving death is guilty of a class B felony.

The director shall revoke the license or permit to drive or nonresident operating privilege of a person convicted under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 253, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0804; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 436; 1995, ch. 379, § 1; 2001, ch. 348, § 1.

39-08-04.1.
Emergency care or services rendered — Liability.

Any person who is an unpaid volunteer, who in good faith, renders emergency care or services at or near the scene of an accident, disaster, or other emergency, or en route to a treatment facility, is not liable to the recipient of the emergency care or services for any damages resulting from the rendering of that care or services.

This section does not relieve a person from liability for damages resulting from the intoxication, willful misconduct, or gross negligence of the person rendering the emergency care or services. Further, liability is not relieved if the emergency care was rendered for remuneration or with the expectation of remuneration.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 372, § 1; 1981, ch. 396, § 1; 1987, ch. 310, § 2.

Cross-References.

Emergency treatment by ambulance service personnel, see § 23-27-04.1.

Emergency treatment by firemen, policemen, or peace officers, see § 32-03-40.

Collateral References.

Construction and application of “Good Samaritan” statutes, 68 A.L.R.4th 294.

Liability for negligence of ambulance attendants, emergency medical technicians, and the like, rendering emergency medical care outside hospital, 16 A.L.R.5th 605.

Law Reviews.

For Case Comment: Health – Medical Malpractice Defenses: Applying Good Samaritan Laws to In-Hospital Emergencies (Chamley v. Khokha, 2007 ND 69, 730 N.W.2d 864), see 84 N.D. L. Rev. 535 (2008).

39-08-05.
Crashes involving damage to vehicle — Penalty.

The driver of any vehicle involved in a crash resulting only in property damage to the driver’s vehicle or any other vehicle shall immediately stop the vehicle at the scene of the crash or as close to the scene of the crash as possible but shall return to and remain at the scene of the crash until the driver has fulfilled the requirements of section 39-08-06 and 39-08-09. Every such stop must be made without obstructing traffic more than is necessary. Any person failing to stop or comply with the requirements in this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 253, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0805; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 437; 2021, ch. 295, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Collateral References.

Construction and application of “amnesty” provision whereby automobile driver leaving scene of accident may report to police within stated time without risk of use of his report against him, 36 A.L.R.4th 907.

Fact that passenger in negligently operated motor vehicle is owner as affecting passenger’s liability to or rights against third person—modern cases, 37 A.L.R.4th 565.

39-08-06.
Duty to give information and render aid.

The driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury to or the death of any person or damage to any vehicle which is driven or attended by any person shall give the driver’s name and address, and the name of the motor vehicle insurance policy carrier of the driver and owner, as well as the registration number, of the vehicle. Upon request, and if available, the driver of any vehicle involved in the accident shall exhibit the driver’s operator’s or chauffeur’s license to the person struck or the driver or occupant of or person attending any other vehicle involved in the accident and shall render to any person injured in the accident reasonable assistance, including the carrying, or the making of arrangements for the carrying, of the person to a physician, surgeon, or hospital for medical or surgical treatment if it is apparent that treatment is necessary or if the carrying is requested by the injured person.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 253, § 3; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0806; S.L. 1979, ch. 421, § 1.

39-08-07.
Duty upon striking unattended vehicle — Penalty.

The driver of any vehicle which collides with any vehicle which is unattended shall immediately stop and shall then and there either locate and notify the operator or owner of the vehicle of the name and address, as well as the name of the motor vehicle insurance policy carrier, of the driver and owner of the vehicle striking the unattended vehicle or shall leave in a conspicuous place in the vehicle struck a written notice giving the name and address, as well as the name of the motor vehicle insurance policy carrier, of the driver and of the owner of the vehicle doing the striking and a statement of the circumstances of the collision. Any person violating this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 253, § 4; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0807; S.L. 1975, ch. 339, § 19; 1979, ch. 421, § 2.

39-08-08.
Duty upon striking highway fixtures or other property.

The driver of any vehicle involved in a crash resulting only in damage to highway fixtures or other property shall take reasonable steps to locate and notify the owner or person in charge of the property of the damage. The driver shall provide the driver’s name, address, and registration number of the vehicle the driver is driving and shall upon request and if available exhibit the driver’s, operator’s, or chauffeur’s license. The driver shall make report of the crash when and as required in section 39-08-09. The driver shall provide the name of the motor vehicle insurance policy carrier and the policy number of the driver, or if the driver is not the owner of the vehicle, then the motor vehicle insurance policy carrier and the policy number of the owner of the vehicle, to the owner or person in charge of the damaged property or to the law enforcement officer investigating the crash.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 253, § 5; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0808; S.L. 1975, ch. 349, § 6; 2021, ch. 295, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Collateral References.

Construction and application of “amnesty” provision whereby automobile driver leaving scene of accident may report to police within stated time without risk of use of his report against him, 36 A.L.R.4th 907.

39-08-09.
Immediate notice of accident — Penalty.

The driver of a vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury to or death of any individual, or property damage to an apparent extent of at least four thousand dollars, shall immediately give notice of the accident to the local police department if the accident occurs within a municipality, otherwise to the office of the county sheriff or the state highway patrol. A driver who violates this section must be assessed a fine of fifty dollars. The name of the motor vehicle insurance policy carrier and the policy number of the driver, or if the driver is not the owner of the vehicle, then the motor vehicle insurance policy carrier and the policy number of the owner of the vehicle, must be furnished to the law enforcement officer investigating the accident. If the driver does not have the required information concerning insurance to furnish to the investigating law enforcement officer, then within five days of the accident the driver shall supply that information to the driver’s license division in the form the division requires.

The director may suspend the license or permit to drive and any nonresident operating privileges of any person failing to comply with the duties as provided in sections 39-08-06 through 39-08-09 until those duties have been fulfilled, and the director may extend the suspension not to exceed thirty days.

The driver of a vehicle involved in an accident with an undomesticated animal resulting in property damage only to the driver’s vehicle is exempt from the notice requirements of this section, regardless of the amount of damage to the driver’s vehicle.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 253, § 6; 1957, ch. 262, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0809; S.L. 1965, ch. 273, § 1; 1971, ch. 373, § 1; 1975, ch. 345, § 1; 1979, ch. 405, § 8; 1983, ch. 434, § 1; 1985, ch. 435, § 1; 1987, ch. 466, § 3; 2013, ch. 302, § 1; 2019, ch. 324, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Collateral References.

Construction and application of “amnesty” provision whereby automobile driver leaving scene of accident may report to police within stated time without risk of use of his report against him, 36 A.L.R.4th 907.

39-08-10.
Officer to report.

Every law enforcement officer, who in the regular course of duty investigates a motor vehicle crash required to be reported as provided in section 39-08-09 either at the time and at the scene of the crash or thereafter by interviewing the participants, or witnesses, shall make and promptly forward to the director a report of the crash in the format prescribed by the director. The report must contain all the information required therein unless the information is not available, and must be transmitted electronically to the department of transportation using the software prescribed by the director.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 253, § 7; 1957, ch. 262, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0810; S.L. 1977, ch. 357, § 1; 1993, ch. 389, § 1; 2021, ch. 295, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

Collateral References.

Discoverability of traffic accident reports and derivative information, 84 A.L.R.4th 15.

39-08-10.1.
Investigating agency responsible to notify immediate family.

In the event of serious injury to or death of any person, under circumstances leading to the notification of a law enforcement agency, the investigating law enforcement agency shall, upon positive identification of the person or persons involved, be responsible for immediately notifying the immediate family of the person or persons seriously injured or deceased, or making arrangements to have the immediate family notified by clergy or other suitable person.

The investigating law enforcement agency may not release to the public the identity of the person or persons seriously injured or deceased until the first of the following events occurs:

A member of the immediate family has been notified and given an opportunity to notify other immediate family members; or

Twenty-four hours have elapsed from the time positive identification was made.

For purposes of this section, “immediate family” means spouse, parent, child, sibling, or any person who regularly resides in the household of the seriously injured or deceased person.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 422, § 1; 1997, ch. 138, § 4.